District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.96

Eligibility requirements.

(a)

An applicant for licensure as an elevator contractor shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant:

(1)

Has in his or her employ individuals licensed under this part who perform the work described by the applicant in the application;

(2)

Has complied with the bonding and insurance requirements established by rule; and

(3)

Meets any other requirements established by rule.

(b)

(1)

An applicant for licensure as an elevator mechanic shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant:

(A)

Has passed the examination required by the Board; and

(B)

Meets any other requirements established by rule.

(2)

Until rules are promulgated pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Board may issue a 2-year license to an applicant who has:

(A)

A certificate of completion of an apprenticeship program for elevator mechanic registered with the Bureau of Apprenticeship Training, U.S. Department of Labor, the District of Columbia Apprenticeship Council, or an equivalent state’s apprenticeship council;

(B)

Worked as an elevator mechanic for 2 years in any combination of construction, maintenance, or repair without direct supervision and for an employer licensed to do business in the District, within the previous 3 years;

(C)

A valid license from a state having standards substantially equal to those of the District; or

(D)

Has passed the examination required by the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs.

(c)

An applicant for licensure as an elevator inspector shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant:

(1)

Meets the requirements of this subchapter;

(2)

Meets the current ASME QEI-1, Standards for the Qualifications of Elevator Inspectors, or equivalent; and

(3)

Meets any other requirement established by rule.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2151(f), 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).